Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in  this section, “client,” “confidential communication,”
“lawyer” and “representative of  the lawyer” have the meanings given those terms in ORS
40.225.
(2) A client has a right to privately communicate with  the client’s lawyer and represen-
tatives of the lawyer.
(3)(a) Any evidence derived from a  confidential communication that is privileged under
ORS 40.225, between a client and the client’s lawyer or a representative of the lawyer, is in-
admissible in any proceeding to which the client is a party if the confidential communication
was obtained or disclosed without the consent of the client.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply to evidence offered by the client.
Passed by House April 24, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 16, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3249 (HB 3249-A) Page 1